Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLI Laws
CHAPTER 447 Public Laws in Force — Court Rules

447.010.
Carroll’s
Kentucky Codes adopted. [Repealed.]

447.020.
Codes
not to be copyrighted. [Repealed.]

447.025.
Repeal
of statutes enacted prior to 1942.

All statute laws of the Commonwealth
of a general and public nature enacted prior to the 1942 Regular Session of
the General Assembly, except the Codes of Practice and such statute laws as
are continued in force by express provision in the body of sections of the
Kentucky Revised Statutes, are hereby repealed.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 208, § 2.

447.030.
Acts
and compilations of former laws, evidence.

The Session Acts and Resolutions
of the General Assembly heretofore or hereafter published, the editions of
the Statutes of Kentucky by Daniel Bradford, by William Littell, by Littell
and Swigert, by Morehead and Brown, and in part by Preston S. Loughborough,
the edition of the Virginia Statutes by William Waller Henning, Richard H.
Stanton’s new edition of the Revised Statutes of Kentucky, the supplement
to the Revised Statutes by Harvey Myers, the General Statutes, the Codes of
Practice, the various editions of Carroll’s Kentucky Statutes and supplements
thereto published prior to 1940, and the various editions of Carroll’s Kentucky
Codes and the supplements thereto, shall be received, in the courts and tribunals
of this state, as evidence of the statute laws in force in this state at the
time of their publication.

History.

2419, 2419a-1, 2419a-4, 2419a-5, 2419a-6, 2420a-1, 2420a-2, 2420a-3.

447.040.
Decisions
of English courts — When authority.

The decisions of the courts
of Great Britain rendered since July 4, 1776, shall not be of binding authority
in the courts of Kentucky.

History.

2418.

447.050.
Statutes
Committee; organization. [Repealed.]

447.060.
Functions
of committee. [Repealed.]

447.070.
Statute
Revision Commission; organization. [Repealed.]

447.080.
Office
space and opinions of Court of Appeals to be furnished commission. [Repealed.]

447.090.
Functions
of commission. [Repealed.]

447.100.
Use
of type from which statutes are printed. [Repealed.]

447.110.
Powers
of commission in preparing editions of the statutes; certification of editions;
admissibility of statute editions in evidence; legislative amendments. [Repealed.]

447.120.
Reviser
of Statutes. [Repealed.]

447.130.
Employes
of commission; compensation of reviser and employes. [Repealed.]

447.140.
Transfer
of functions and funds of Statute Committee. [Repealed.]

447.150.
Civil
Code, committee for revision of. [Repealed.]

447.151.
Court
of Appeals to promulgate Rules of Civil Procedure. [Repealed.]

447.152.
Bench
and bar to receive proposed rules — Procedure for consideration of suggestions
and amendments — Time for distributing rules. [Repealed.]

447.153.
Appointment
and duties of advisory committee of judicial council. [Repealed.]

447.154.
Laws
not to limit right of Court of Justice to promulgate rules.

No act creating, repealing,
or modifying any statute shall be construed directly, or by implication, to
limit the right of the Court of Justice to promulgate rules from time to time
or to supersede, modify, or amend any rule so promulgated. Nor shall any statute
be construed to limit in any manner the power of the Court of Justice to make
rules governing practice and procedure in the courts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 18, § 4, effective February 25, 1952; 1966, ch. 255, § 279, effective June 16, 1966; 1976, ch. 62, § 127, effective June 19, 1976.

447.155.
When
Rules of Civil Procedure apply to criminal procedure. [Repealed.]

447.156.
When
laws of pleading, practice and procedure become effective as rules of court.
[Repealed.]

447.157.
Printing
and distribution of rules. [Repealed.]

447.160.
Constitution
Review Commission; appointment; terms; vacancies; officers; meetings. [Repealed.]

447.170.
Expenses
of members; employment of assistants. [Repealed.]

447.180.
Functions
of commission; reports. [Repealed.]

447.200.
Duties
of Statute Revision Commission and Reviser of statutes in transfer of Civil
Code sections to Kentucky Revised Statutes. [Repealed.]

447.310.
Criminal
Code Revision. [Repealed.]